District of Columbia statutes.
29-414.01

Application to existing domestic corporations.

Except as otherwise provided by § 29-107.01, this chapter shall apply to all domestic nonprofit corporations in existence on its effective date that were incorporated under any general statute of the District providing for incorporation of nonprofit corporations.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(d)(21), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added “Except as otherwise provided by § 29-107.01.”
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.